Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 36. Rights not enumerated reserved to people.

The enumeration in this constitution, of certain rights shall not be construed to deny, impair, or disparage others retained by the people.

Powers of legislature. —

The legislature is vested with all legislative powers of the state, and has power to do anything within the domain of legislation which is not repugnant to the state or federal constitutions. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

Right to associate with one's family is a fundamental liberty under Wyoming constitution.

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Right to travel. —

Ruling of trial court which changed custody from mother to father due to mother's relocation within state, beyond limit contained in divorce decree, amounted to an infringement on mother's constitutional right to travel. Watt v. Watt, 971 P.2d 608,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1999), overruled in part, Arnott v. Arnott, 2012 WY 167, 293 P.3d 440,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2012).

Burden on party claiming infringement.—

Defendant’s conviction for sexual contact with a resident of a correctional facility did not violate her due process rights under either the state or federal constitutions because the statutes at issue clearly proscribed her conduct, the State had an undeniable interest in ensuring the relationship of state prisoners and the state officers who supervised their confinement was not undermined by sexual contact, consensual or otherwise, and, although defendant raised the Wyoming constitutional argument below and on appeal, her argument largely echoed her argument under the federal constitution and she provided no analysis of any of the requisite factors or legal reasons justifying resort to independent state grounds. Sheesley v. State, 2019 WY 32, 437 P.3d 830,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2019).

Applied

in

DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999); Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

§ 37. Constitution of United States supreme law of land.

The State of Wyoming is an inseparable part of the federal union, and the constitution of the United States is the supreme law of the land.

Interpretation by United States supreme court is controlling. —

This section necessarily means the constitution of the United States as interpreted by the United States supreme court is controlling law in Wyoming. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

The primacy of the supreme court of the United States in constitutional areas is firmly embedded in the law by judicial decision and the state constitution. Doe v. Burk, 513 P.2d 643,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1973).

The supreme court of the United States is the final arbiter as to the federal constitution. State ex rel. Mansfield v. State Bd. of Law Examiners, 601 P.2d 174,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1979).

Application of state constitutional provisions not to infringe upon federal constitutional standards. —

There is no reason why the Wyoming supreme court should not apply Wyoming constitutional provisions in the administration of its jurisprudence, as long as they do not infringe upon the constitutional standards of the United States constitution. Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 558 P.2d 509,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1977).

First amendment not superseded by Wyoming constitution. —

Article 1, § 20, Wyo. Const. (freedom of speech and press), does not provide an avenue of relief that supersedes well-established first amendment law in defamation cases. Spence v. Flynt, 816 P.2d 771,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. Sept. 16, 1991), cert. denied, 503 U.S. 984, 112 S. Ct. 1668, 118 L. Ed. 2d 388, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 2342 (U.S. 1992).

Federal constitution does not impair proper exercise of the state police power.

State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Johnson v. Crane, 65 Wyo. 189, 197 P.2d 864,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1948); Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976); Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285

(10th Cir. 1977); Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983); O'Brien v. State, 711 P.2d 1144,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1986); Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Oct. 23, 2015).

Quoted

in

Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964); Foster's Inc. v. City of Laramie, 718 P.2d 868,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1986); Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Quenzer v. Quenzer, 653 P.2d 295,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1982); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal question jurisdiction in declaratory judgment suit challenging state statute or regulation on grounds of federal preemption, 69 ALR Fed 753.

Annotation, construction, and application of 28 U.S.C. § 2403 (and similar predecessor provisions), concerning intervention by United States or by state in certain federal court cases involving constitutionality of statutes, 147 ALR Fed 613.

§ 38. Right of health care access.

Each competent adult shall have the right to make his or her own health care decisions. The parent, guardian or legal representative of any other natural person shall have the right to make health care decisions for that person.

Any person may pay, and a health care provider may accept, direct payment for health care without imposition of penalties or fines for doing so.

The legislature may determine reasonable and necessary restrictions on the rights granted under this section to protect the health and general welfare of the people or to accomplish the other purposes set forth in the Wyoming Constitution.

The state of Wyoming shall act to preserve these rights from undue governmental infringement.

History.

Added by 2011 Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2, Section 1, ratified in 2012.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 2011, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, Section 1, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 6, 2012, and certified on November 14, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

2011 Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, Section 2, provided the following statement from the Secretary of State: “The adoption of this amendment will provide that the right to make health care decisions is reserved to the citizens of the state of Wyoming. It permits any person to pay and any health care provider to receive direct payment for services. The amendment permits the legislature to place reasonable and necessary restrictions on health care consistent with the purposes of the Wyoming Constitution and provides that this state shall act to preserve these rights from undue governmental infringement.”

§ 39. Opportunity to hunt, fish and trap.

The opportunity to fish, hunt and trap wildlife is a heritage that
shall forever be preserved to the individual citizens of the state,
subject to regulation as prescribed by law, and does not create a
right to trespass on private property, diminish other private rights
or alter the duty of the state to manage wildlife.

History.

Added by 2011 Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, Section 1, ratified in 2012.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 2011, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, Section 1, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 6, 2012, and certified on November 14, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

2011 Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, Section 2, provided the following statement from the Secretary of State:

“The adoption of this amendment will recognize and preserve the heritage of Wyoming citizens' opportunity to fish, hunt, and trap wildlife, subject to regulations as prescribed by law.”

Cited

in

Hanesworth v. Johnke, 783 P.2d 173,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).